Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.290

Proceedings for administrative dissolution—Reinstatement—Survival of actions.

Failure of the corporation to file its annual report within the time required shall not derogate from the rights of its creditors, or prevent the corporation from being sued and from defending lawsuits, nor shall it release the corporation from any of the duties or liabilities of a corporation under law.

A corporation shall be administratively dissolved by the secretary of state under the circumstances and procedures provided in Article 6 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

A corporation which has been administratively dissolved under RCW 23.95.610 may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement in accordance with RCW 23.95.615.

When a corporation has been administratively dissolved under RCW 23.95.610, remedies available to or against it shall survive in the manner provided by RCW 24.06.335 and thereafter the directors of the corporation shall hold title to the property of the corporation as trustees for the benefit of its creditors and shareholders.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4116; 1994 c 287 s 10; 1993 c 356 s 18; 1982 c 35 s 141; 1973 c 70 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 58.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—1993 c 356: See note following RCW 24.06.046.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.